District of Columbia statutes.
1-136.02

Repealed

Operations of the 51st State Commission.

Repealed.

Mar. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-127, § 3, 57 DCR 1183
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 102, 62 DCR 1884
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 102 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 102 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Section 4 of D.C. Law 18-127 provided that this act shall apply upon inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 18-127 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 18-127, are not in effect.